Hawaii statutes.
[§663-1.55] Volunteer firefighters; limited
liability. Any volunteer firefighter who in good faith renders
firefighting services shall not be liable for any civil damages resulting from
the person's acts or omissions occurring during the course of firefighting,
except for such damages as may result from the person's gross negligence, or
wanton acts or omissions.

For purposes of this section, volunteer
firefighter means any person who trains as a volunteer firefighter and who, of
the person's own free will, provides firefighting services in a fire emergency
without remuneration or expectation of remuneration.

For purposes of this section, good faith
includes, but is not limited to, a reasonable opinion that the immediacy of a
fire is such that the rendering of firefighting service should not be
postponed. [L 1993, c 269, §1]

Cross References

Ratemaking of insurance, see §431:14-103.

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next